California statutes. Public Resources Code
-------------------------------------------

75079.

The Secretary shall appoint a citizen advisory committee to review the annual audit and to identify and recommend actions to ensure that the intent and purposes of this division are met by the agencies responsible for implementation of this division.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. Fiscal Provisions [75080. - 75090.]

75080.

Bonds in the total amount of five billion three hundred and eighty eight million dollars ($5,388,000,000), not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 75088, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to be used for carrying out the purposes set forth in this division and to be used to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bond proceeds shall be deposited in the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Fund of 2006 created by Section 75009. The bonds shall, when sold, be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal of and interest on the bonds as they become due and payable.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75081.

The bonds authorized by this division shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and all provisions of that law shall apply to the bonds and to this division and are hereby incorporated in this division by this reference as though fully set forth in this division.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75082.

(a) Solely for the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale, pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law, of the bonds authorized by this division, the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Finance Committee is hereby created. For purposes of this division, the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Finance Committee is “the committee” as that term is used by the State General Obligation Bond Law. The committee shall consist of the Controller, the Director of Finance, and the Treasurer, or their designated representatives. The Treasurer shall serve as chairperson of the committee. A majority of the committee may act for the committee.

(b) For purposes of this chapter and the State General Obligation Bond Law, the secretary is designated as “the board.”

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75083.

The committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this division in order to carry out the actions specified in this division and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75084.

There shall be collected annually in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds maturing each year, and it is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do so and perform each and every act that is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75085.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund, for purposes of this division, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this division, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum which is necessary to carry out the provisions of Section 75086, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75086.

For the purposes of carrying out this division, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that have been authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this division. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, plus the interest that the amounts would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from money received from the sale of bonds that would otherwise be deposited in that fund.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75087.

All money derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75088.

Any bonds issued or sold pursuant to this division may be refunded by the issuance of refunding bonds in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Approval by the electors of the state for the issuance of the bonds shall include approval of the issuance of any bonds issued to refund any bonds originally issued or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75089.

Notwithstanding any other law, one hundred five million dollars ($105,000,000) of the unissued bonds authorized for the purposes of this division are reallocated for the purposes of, and shall be authorized, issued, and appropriated in accordance with, Division 26.7 (commencing with Section 79700) of the Water Code.
 The funds available for reallocation shall be made on a pro-rata basis from each bond allocation of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 2.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

75089.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, twelve million dollars ($12,000,000) of the unissued bonds authorized for the purpose of subdivision (a) of Section 75063, three hundred fifteen thousand dollars ($315,000) of the unissued bonds authorized for the purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 75063, and four million three hundred twenty-eight thousand dollars ($4,328,000) of the unissued bonds authorized for the purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 75065 are reallocated to finance the purposes of, and shall be authorized, issued, and appropriated in accordance with, Division 45 (commencing with Section 80000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

75090.

The people of California hereby find and declare that inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this division are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitation imposed by that article.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12. Implementation Provisions [75100. - 75104.]

75100.

(a) (1) Each state agency disbursing a competitive grant pursuant to this division shall develop project solicitation and evaluation guidelines. The guidelines may include a limitation on the size of a competitive grant to be awarded.

(2) Prior to disbursing a competitive grant, each state agency shall conduct at least one public meeting to consider public comments prior to finalizing the guidelines. Each state agency shall publish the draft solicitation and evaluation guidelines on its Internet Web site at least 30 days before the public meetings. Meetings shall be held at geographically appropriate locations. Upon adoption, each state agency shall transmit copies of the guidelines to the fiscal committees and the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. To the extent feasible, each state agency shall provide outreach to disadvantaged communities to promote access and participation in those meetings.

(3) The guidelines may include a requirement for the applicant to illustrate an ongoing commitment of financial resources, unless the purposes of awarding a grant financed by this division is to assist a disadvantaged community.

(4) The guidelines shall require a new grant solicitation for each funding cycle. Each funding cycle shall consider only those applications received as a part of the solicitation for that funding cycle.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a state agency, in lieu of adopting guidelines pursuant to subdivision (a), may use guidelines existing on January 1, 2007, and those guidelines as periodically amended thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 5, the provisions of Division 43 added on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 84 (Sections 75001 to 75090) prevail over any conflicting provision of Ch. 729.)
-------------------------------------------

75101.

(a) (1) Costs subsequently recovered from a party responsible for the contamination pursuant to Section 75025 shall be repaid to the state board and deposited in the Groundwater Contamination Cleanup Project Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Costs recovered shall be separately accounted for within the Groundwater Contamination Cleanup Project Fund.

(2) Moneys in the Groundwater Contamination Cleanup Project Fund are available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the state board for the purpose of a grant to the grantee that received funds and subsequently recovered costs from a responsible party and repaid those costs to the state in the
 following priority order:

(A) Projects and activities to clean up areas of groundwater contamination within the grantee’s jurisdiction where the initial grant awarded pursuant to Section 75025 is insufficient to pay for the full costs of the cleanup.

(B) Projects and activities to clean up additional areas of groundwater contamination within the grantee’s jurisdiction.

(3) (A) The total amount of the grant awarded pursuant to Section 75025 and the amount awarded pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed the grantee’s total costs to clean up contaminated groundwater or prevent the contamination of groundwater.

(B) If costs recovered by the grantee and deposited in the Groundwater Contamination Cleanup Project Fund exceed the
 amount that may be awarded as a grant pursuant to the limit in subparagraph (A), the excess moneys shall be available to the state board, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for expenditure on orphan groundwater contamination cleanup projects. The state board shall consult with the Department of Toxic Substances Control when considering expenditures on orphan groundwater contamination cleanup projects.

(4) The grantee shall use an amount awarded pursuant to this subdivision for groundwater contamination cleanup activities for groundwater that is a primary source of drinking water, including, but not limited to, ongoing treatment and remediation activities in accordance with the purposes of Section 75025.

(5) When seeking grant funds pursuant to paragraph (2), a grantee shall submit an expenditure plan to the state board for projects consistent with this subdivision. The state
 board shall review the submitted expenditure plan and consult with the Department of Toxic Substances Control for sites where the Department of Toxic Substances Control is the lead state agency. The state board shall notify the grantee if the expenditure plan is approved, and if approved, the state board shall disburse the funds.

(6) Grants awarded pursuant to this subdivision may be used for capital costs and treatment and remediation activities.

(7) Commencing no later than July 1, 2015, and annually thereafter until the grantee’s funds are expended, a grantee of funds awarded pursuant to this subdivision shall provide public notice, by posting a list on the grantee’s Internet Web site, of projects and activities that receive grant funds pursuant to this subdivision and the amount of those funds.

(8) As used in
 this subdivision, “costs subsequently recovered from a party responsible for the contamination” means the amount of any judgment or settlement received by a grantee of funds received pursuant to Section 75025 from a responsible party that is attributable to costs funded by the grant received pursuant to Section 75025, less all reasonable and necessary costs of response incurred by the grantee of funds received pursuant to Section 75025 to recover these funds. Attorney’s fees may be considered reasonable and necessary costs of response if the attorney’s efforts are for identifying potentially responsible parties, but not if incurred in pursuit of litigation, consistent with the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, as amended (42 U.S.C. Sec. 9601 et seq.), and Key Tronic Corp. v. U.S. (511 U.S. 809 (1994)).

(9) The state board may use moneys in the Groundwater Contamination Cleanup Project Fund, upon
 appropriation by the Legislature, for the costs of administering this subdivision.

(b) The state board may directly recover moneys from a party responsible for contamination addressed by a loan or grant pursuant to Section 75025 in accordance with the procedures described in subdivision (c) of Section 13304 of the Water Code. The state board, upon appropriation by the Legislature, may use moneys in the Groundwater Contamination Cleanup Project Fund for this purpose. If moneys from the Groundwater Contamination Cleanup Project Fund are used for legal costs pursuant to this subdivision, moneys recovered by a judgment in favor of the state board shall be deposited in that fund.

(c) For the purposes of implementing subdivision (a) of Section 75050, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, when funding a natural community conservation plan, shall fund only the development of a natural
 community conservation plan that is consistent with the Natural Community Conservation Planning Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code).

(d) The San Francisco Bay Area Conservancy may use the funds made available pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 75060 to restore the salt ponds in the south San Francisco Bay and to create trails and visitor facilities for public use in that area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 349, Sec. 1.   (AB 1043)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 729.  Pursuant to Sec. 5 of Ch. 729, the provisions of Division 43 added on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 84 (Sections 75001 to 75090) prevail over any conflicting provision of Ch. 729.)
-------------------------------------------

75102.

Before the adoption of a negative declaration or environmental impact report required under Section 75070, the lead agency shall notify the proposed action to a California Native American tribe, which is on the contact list maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission, if that tribe has traditional lands located within the area of the proposed project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 5, the provisions of Division 43 added on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 84 (Sections 75001 to 75090) prevail over any conflicting provision of Ch. 729.)
-------------------------------------------

75103.

It is the intent of the Legislature that any public funds made available by this division to investor-owned utilities regulated by the Public Utilities Commission should be for the benefit of the ratepayers or the public and not the investors pursuant to oversight by the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 5, the provisions of Division 43 added on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 84 (Sections 75001 to 75090) prevail over any conflicting provision of Ch. 729.)
-------------------------------------------

75104.

State agencies that are authorized to award a loan or grant financed by this division shall provide technical assistance with regard to the preparation of an application for a loan or grant in a manner that, among other things, addresses the needs of economically disadvantaged communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 5, the provisions of Division 43 added on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 84 (Sections 75001 to 75090) prevail over any conflicting provision of Ch. 729.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13. Strategic Growth Council and Climate Change Reduction [75120. - 75130.]

75120.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Council” means the Strategic Growth Council established pursuant to Section 75121.

(b) “Regional plan” means either of the following:

(1) A long-range transportation plan developed pursuant to Section 134(g) of Title 23 of the United States Code and any applicable state requirements.

(2) A regional blueprint plan, which is a regional plan that implements statutory requirements intended to foster comprehensive planning as defined in Section 65041.1 of, Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 65080) of Division 1 of Title 7 of, and Article 10.6 (commencing with Section 65580) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 7 of, the Government Code. A regional blueprint plan articulates regional consensus and performance outcomes on a more efficient land use pattern that supports improved mobility and reduces dependency on single-occupancy vehicle trips; accommodates an adequate supply of housing for all income levels; reduces impacts on valuable farmland, natural resources, and air quality, including the reduction of greenhouse gas emissions, increases water and energy conservation and efficiency; and promotes a prosperous economy and safe, healthy, sustainable, and vibrant neighborhoods.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 5, the provisions of Division 43 added on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 84 (Sections 75001 to 75090) prevail over any conflicting provision of Ch. 729.)
-------------------------------------------

75121.

(a) The Strategic Growth Council is hereby established in state government and it shall consist of the Director of State Planning and Research, the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, the Secretary for Environmental Protection, the Secretary of Transportation, the Secretary of California Health and Human Services, the Secretary of Business, Consumer Services, and Housing, the Secretary of Food and Agriculture, one member of the public appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, one member of the public appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and one member of the public to be appointed by the Governor. The public members shall have a background in land use planning, local government, resource protection and management, or community development or revitalization and shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing
 authority.

(b) Staff for the council shall be reflective of the council’s membership.

(c) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2026, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 100.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.\n   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 101 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 28.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 729. Pursuant to Sec. 5 of Ch. 729, the provisions of Division 43 added on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 84 (Sections 75001 to 75090) prevail over any conflicting provision of Ch. 729.)
-------------------------------------------

75121.

(a) The Strategic Growth Council is hereby established in state government and it shall consist of the Director of State Planning and Research, the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, the Secretary for Environmental Protection, the Secretary of Transportation, the Secretary of California Health and Human Services, the Secretary of California Housing and Homelessness, the Secretary of Food and Agriculture, one member of the public appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, one member of the public appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and one member of the public to be appointed by the Governor. The public members shall have a background in land use planning, local government, resource protection and management, or community development or revitalization and shall serve at the pleasure of the
 appointing authority.

(b) Staff for the council shall be reflective of the council’s membership.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 100) and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 101.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

75122.

The members of the council shall elect a chair of the council every two years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 5, the provisions of Division 43 added on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 84 (Sections 75001 to 75090) prevail over any conflicting provision of Ch. 729.)
-------------------------------------------

75123.

(a) A meeting of the council, including a meeting related to the development of grant guidelines and policies and the approval of grants, shall be subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except that, for purposes of this section, “meeting” shall not include a meeting at which:

(1) Council members are meeting as members of the Governor’s cabinet.

(2) Council staff and member agency staff are meeting to discuss, but not take final action on, any of the following:

(A) State agency coordination to improve air and water quality, improve natural resource protection, increase the availability of affordable housing, improve transportation, revitalize urban and community centers in a sustainable manner, and other priorities specified in subdivision (a) of Section 75125.

(B) Preliminary policy recommendations and investment strategies to the Governor, the Legislature, and appropriate state agencies to encourage the development of sustainable communities, as set forth in
 subdivision (b) of Section 75125.

(C) Developing grant guidelines, such as those specified in Section 75125, that are otherwise subject to public participation process requirements.

(b) The council may sponsor conferences, symposia, and other public forums, to seek a broad range of public advice regarding local, regional, and natural resource planning, sustainable development, and strategies to reduce and mitigate climate change.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 606, Sec. 3.   (SB 246)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 729.  Pursuant to Sec. 5 of Ch. 729, the provisions of Division 43 added on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 84 (Sections 75001 to 75090) prevail over any conflicting provision of Ch. 729.)
-------------------------------------------

75124.

Of the funds made available pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (c) of Section 75065, the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) is hereby appropriated to the Resources Agency to be used in support of the council and its activities in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 5, the provisions of Division 43 added on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 84 (Sections 75001 to 75090) prevail over any conflicting provision of Ch. 729.)
-------------------------------------------

75125.

The council shall do all of the following:

(a) Identify and review activities and funding programs of state agencies that may be coordinated to improve air and water quality, improve natural resource protection, increase the availability of affordable housing, improve transportation, meet the goals of the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code) and the strategies and priorities developed in
 the state’s climate adaptation strategy known as the Safeguarding California Plan adopted pursuant to Section 71152, encourage sustainable land use planning, and revitalize urban and community centers in a sustainable manner. At a minimum, the council shall review and comment on the five-year infrastructure plan developed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 13100) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and the State Environmental Goals and Policy Report developed pursuant to Section 65041 of the Government Code.

(b) Recommend policies and investment strategies and priorities to the Governor, the Legislature, and to appropriate state agencies to encourage the development of sustainable communities, such as those communities that promote equity, strengthen the economy, protect the
 environment, and promote public health and safety, consistent with subdivisions (a) and (c) of Section 75065.

(c) Provide, fund, and distribute data and information to local governments and regional agencies that will assist in developing and planning sustainable communities.

(d) Manage and award grants and loans to support the planning and development of sustainable communities, pursuant to Sections 75127, 75128, and 75129. To implement this subdivision, the council may do all of the following:

(1) Develop guidelines for awarding financial assistance, including criteria for eligibility and additional consideration.

(2) Develop criteria for determining the amount of
 financial assistance to be awarded. The council shall award a revolving loan to an applicant for a planning project, unless the council determines that the applicant lacks the fiscal capacity to carry out the project without a grant. The council may establish criteria that would allow the applicant to illustrate an ongoing commitment of financial resources to ensure the completion of the proposed plan or project.

(3) Provide for payments of interest on loans made pursuant to this article. The rate of interest shall not exceed the rate earned by the Pooled Money Investment Board.

(4) Provide for the time period for repaying a loan made pursuant to this article.

(5) Provide for the recovery of funds from an applicant
 that fails to complete the project for which financial assistance was awarded. The council shall direct the Controller to recover funds by any available means.

(6) Provide technical assistance for application preparation.

(7) Designate a state agency or department to administer technical and financial assistance programs for the disbursing of grants and loans to support the planning and development of sustainable communities, pursuant to Sections 75127, 75128, and 75129.

(e) Provide an annual report to the Legislature that shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A list of applicants for financial assistance.

(2) Identification of which applications were approved.

(3) The amounts awarded for each approved application.

(4) The remaining balance of available funds.

(5) A report on the proposed or ongoing management of each funded project.

(6) Any additional minimum requirements and priorities for a project or plan proposed in a grant or loan application developed and adopted by the council pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 75126.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 603, Sec. 3.   (AB 1482)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 729.  Pursuant to Sec. 5 of Ch. 729, the provisions of Division 43 added on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 84 (Sections 75001 to 75090) prevail over any conflicting provision of Ch. 729.)
-------------------------------------------

75126.

(a) An applicant shall declare, in the application submitted to the council for financial assistance for a plan or project pursuant to this chapter, the applicant’s intention to follow a detailed budget and schedule for the completion of the plan or project. The budget and schedule shall be of sufficient detail to allow the council to assess the progress of the applicant at regular intervals.

(b) A project or plan funded pursuant to this chapter shall meet both of the following criteria:

(1) Be consistent with the state’s planning policies pursuant to Section 65041.1 of the Government Code.

(2) Reduce, on as permanent a basis that is feasible, greenhouse gas emissions consistent with the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code), and any applicable regional plan.

(c) The council may develop additional minimum requirements and priorities for a project or plan proposed in a grant and loan application, including those related to improving air quality.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 5, the provisions of Division 43 added on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 84 (Sections 75001 to 75090) prevail over any conflicting provision of Ch. 729.)
-------------------------------------------

75127.

(a) To support the planning and development of sustainable communities, the council shall manage and award financial assistance to a city or county for preparing, adopting, and implementing a general plan or general plan element that is designed to reduce greenhouse gas emissions, promote water conservation, reduce automobile use and fuel consumption, encourage greater infill and compact development, protect natural resources and agricultural lands, and revitalize urban and community centers.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the preparation and adoption of a general plan may include a comprehensive update of a general plan, amendment or adoption of an individual element of a general plan, or any other revision consistent with the intent of Section 75065.

(c) For the purposes of this section, the implementation of a general plan may include amendment or adoption of a specific plan, community plan, zoning ordinance, or any other plan, ordinance, or policy that is consistent with the intent of Section 75065.

(d) The funding provided pursuant to this section for the preparation, adoption, and implementation of a general plan may also include funding any activity necessary to conform a general plan to a regional plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 5, the provisions of Division 43 added on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 84 (Sections 75001 to 75090) prevail over any conflicting provision of Ch. 729.)
-------------------------------------------

75128.

(a) To support the planning and development of sustainable communities, the council shall manage and award financial assistance to a council of governments, metropolitan planning organization, regional transportation planning agency, city, county, or joint powers authority, to develop, adopt or implement a regional plan or other planning instrument consistent with a regional plan that improves air and water quality, improves natural resource protection, increases the availability of affordable housing, improves transportation, meets the goals of the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code), and encourages sustainable land use. The financial assistance provided pursuant to this section shall be funded from moneys made available pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 75065.

(b) In awarding financial assistance pursuant to this section, the council shall give first priority to an application seeking funding to add or enhance elements of a regional plan that are not funded with federal moneys.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 5, the provisions of Division 43 added on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 84 (Sections 75001 to 75090) prevail over any conflicting provision of Ch. 729.)
-------------------------------------------

75129.

(a) To support the planning and development of sustainable communities, the council shall manage and award financial assistance to a city, county, special district, nonprofit organization, or entity formed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of the Government Code, if at least one of the parties to the joint powers agreement qualifies as an eligible applicant, for the preparation, planning, and implementation of an urban greening project that provides multiple benefits, including, but not limited to, a decrease in air and water pollution, a reduction in the consumption of natural resources and energy, an increase in the reliability of local water supplies, or an increased adaptability to climate change. An eligible
 project funded pursuant to this section shall not include a mitigation action that is required under existing law. The financial assistance provided pursuant to this section shall be funded from moneys made available pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 75065.

(b) The council shall develop minimum requirements for funding eligible projects pursuant to this section, which shall require a project to meet at least one of the following criteria:

(1) Use natural systems, or systems that mimic natural systems, to achieve the benefits identified in subdivision (a).

(2) Create, enhance, or expand community green spaces.

(c) The multiple benefits of a project, may include, but are not limited to, the establishment or enhancement of one or more of the
 following:

(1) Tree canopy.

(2) Urban forestry.

(3) Local parks and open space.

(4) Greening of existing public lands and structures, including schools.

(5) Multi-objective stormwater projects, including construction of permeable surfaces and collection basins and barriers.

(6) Urban streams, including restoration.

(7) Community, demonstration, or outdoor education gardens and orchards.

(8) Urban heat island mitigation and energy conservation efforts through landscaping and green roof projects.

(9) Nonmotorized urban trails that provide safe routes for both recreation and travel between residences, workplaces, commercial centers, and schools.

(d) The council shall give additional consideration to a funding project pursuant to this section that meets one or more of the following criteria:

(1) The project uses interagency cooperation and integration.

(2) The project uses existing public lands and facilitates use of public resources and investments including schools.

(3) The project is proposed by an economically disadvantaged community.

(e) Up to 25 percent of the moneys allocated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section
 75065 may be used to award revolving loans or grants to a city, county, special district, nonprofit organization, council of governments, metropolitan planning organization, or entity formed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of the Government Code, if at least one of the parties to the joint powers agreement qualifies as an eligible applicant, for the purpose of creating urban greening plans that will serve as the master document guiding and coordinating greening projects in the applicant’s jurisdiction. These urban greening plans shall be consistent with the jurisdiction’s general plan or regional plan, where one exists.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 632, Sec. 1.   (SB 1006)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 729.  Pursuant to Sec. 5 of Ch. 729, the provisions of Division 43 added on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 84 (Sections 75001 to 75090) prevail over any conflicting provision of Ch. 729.)
-------------------------------------------

75129.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the council may, using existing or private funds, provide public members of the California Agricultural Land Equity Task Force, established pursuant to Provision 8 of Item 0650-001-0001 of the Budget Act of 2022 (Chapters 43, 45, and 249 of the Statutes of 2022), a reasonable per diem allowance as specified in Section 11564.5 of the Government Code, or at a higher rate that may be established by the task force, for each day’s attendance at a noticed meeting of the task force.

(b) The report required pursuant to Provision 8 of Item 0650-001-0001 of the Budget Act of 2022 (Chapters 43, 45, and 249 of the Statutes of 2022) shall be posted on the council’s internet
 website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 917, Sec. 5.   (SB 1448)   Effective September 28, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

75130.

This chapter does not authorize the council to take an action with regard to the exercise of a local government’s land use permitting authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 5, the provisions of Division 43 added on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 84 (Sections 75001 to 75090) prevail over any conflicting provision of Ch. 729.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 44. TRANSIT, AFFORDABLE HOUSING, AND SUSTAINABLE COMMUNITIES PROGRAM [75200. - 75260.]



PART 1. Affordable Housing and Sustainable Communities [75200. - 75218.2.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [75200. - 75200.3.]

75200.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the AHSC Housing Allocation and AHSC Sustainable Communities Allocation be administered in a manner that supports coordinated and complementary investments that reduce greenhouse gas emissions, expand affordable housing opportunities, strengthen sustainable communities, and maximize the public benefit of state, regional, and local infrastructure investments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 68, Sec. 27.   (AB 179)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

75200.1.

For purposes of this part, the following definitions apply:
